Illinois, session 104th, HB2575.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by adding Section 524-3.10 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/24-3.10 new)7    Sec. 24-3.10. Attendance for appointed State work. Any 8public school employee who is a member of a statewide 9association and is appointed to a State board, advisory 10council, committee, commission, or task force to represent the 11association in State work may spend up to 10 days during a 12school term representing the association in State work. No 13deduction of wages may be made for such absence. 14    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 15becoming law.